District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

1-301.02

Appointment of contracting officers; powers; approval of contracts over $3,000; void contracts; liquidated damage contracts.

Repealed.

Dec. 20, 1944, 58 Stat. 821, ch. 611, § 2
Aug. 16, 1949, 63 Stat. 607, ch. 438
April 12, 1997, D.C. Law 11-259, § 404, 44 DCR 1423
1981 Ed., § 1-339.
1973 Ed., § 1-245.

Amendment of Mayor’s Order 90-178, Delegation of Contracting Authority; Delegation of Personnel Authority; and Establishment of Position of Administrator in the Commission on Mental Health Services: See Mayor’s Order 96-172, December 9, 1996 ( 43 DCR 6973).

Amendment of Mayor’s Order 96-172, Establishing Position of Administrator in the Commission on Mental Health Services; Appointment of Interim Administrator; Duties of Administrator: See Mayor’s Order 97-6, January 9, 1997 ( 44 DCR 357).